District of Columbia statutes.
46-356.03

Effect of registration for enforcement.

(a)

A support order or income-withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order is registered when the order is filed in the registering tribunal of the District.

(b)

A registered support order issued in another state or a foreign country is enforceable in the same manner and is subject to the same procedures as an order issued by a tribunal of the District.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a tribunal of the District shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, a registered support order if the issuing tribunal had jurisdiction.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 603, 63 DCR 222